Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF654.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 481A.41 Tree stands for hunting deer on public land ââ identification ââ prohibition. 1. A person shall not place a tree stand for hunting deer on public land unless the stand is affixed with and exhibits a metal plate that plainly shows the department-issued identification number of the owner of the stand. A person who fails to properly identify a tree stand placed on public land belonging to the person is subject to a scheduled fine under section 805.8B, subsection 3, paragraph âbâ . 2. An owner of a tree stand placed on public land shall not be held liable for damage to personal property or an injury resulting from another personâs use of the tree stand. 3. The natural resource commission shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to implement this section. Sec. 2. Section 481A.90, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2. This section does not prohibit the owner , the ownerâs agent, or a drainage district from destroying a den or breaching or altering a beaver dam to protect the ownerâs property. Senate File 654, p. 2 Sec. 3. Section 481A.92, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 1. A person shall not use or attempt to use colony traps in taking, capturing, trapping, or killing any game or fur-bearing animals except muskrats as determined by rule of the commission. Box traps capable of capturing more than one game or fur-bearing animal at each setting are prohibited. A valid hunting license is required for box trapping cottontail rabbits and squirrels. All traps and snares used for the taking of fur-bearing animals shall have a metal tag attached plainly labeled with the userâs department-issued identification number or name and address. All traps and snares, except those which that are placed entirely under water, shall be checked at least once every twenty-four hours. Officers appointed by the department may confiscate such traps and snares found in use that are not properly labeled or checked. Sec. 4. Section 481A.95, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 2. Fees for a license issued under this section shall be no more than fifty dollars annually for a resident or a nonresident fur dealer. Sec. 5. Section 481C.2, subsections 1 and 2, Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 1. The director of the department of natural resources shall enter into a memorandum of agreement with the United States department of agriculture, animal damage control division. The wild animal depredation unit shall serve and act as the liaison to the department for the producers in the state who suffer crop, horticultural product, tree, or nursery damage an economic loss to agriculture, horticulture, or silviculture operations due to wild animals. 2. The department shall issue depredation permits and deer shooting permits to any landowner or tenant, as defined under section 483A.24, subsection 2, upon receiving written approval from the landowner, who incurs crop, horticultural product, tree, or nursery damage suffers an economic loss of one thousand dollars or more to agriculture, horticulture, or silviculture operations due to wild animals. The department Senate File 654, p. 3 shall allow any conservation officer to issue permits pursuant to this chapter. Sec. 6. Section 481C.2A, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: a. Deer shooting permits shall be available for issuance to landowners or tenants, as defined under section 483A.24, subsection 2, upon receiving written approval from the landowner, who incur crop, horticultural product, tree, or nursery damage suffer an economic loss to agriculture, horticulture, or silviculture operations as provided in section 481C.2 and shall be available for issuance for use on areas where public safety may be an issue. Sec. 7. Section 805.8B, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: b. For violations of section 481A.41, subsection 1, sections 481A.54 , 481A.69 , 481A.71 , 481A.72 , 482.6 , 483A.3 , 483A.6 , 483A.8A , 483A.19 , 483A.27 , and 483A.27A , the scheduled fine is thirty dollars. ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House I hereby certify that this bill originated in the Senate and is known as Senate File 654, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ W. CHARLES SMITHSON Secretary of the Senate Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor